Maine, session 132, LD1942.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §1811, sub-§1, ¶D, as amended by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. H, §23
and affected by §29 and amended by c. 673, §22 and affected by §28, is further amended
to read:
D. For sales occurring on or after October 1, 2019 and before January 1, 2026, the rate
of tax is 5.5% on the value of all tangible personal property and taxable services, except
the rate of tax is:
(1) Eight percent on the value of prepared food;
(2) Eight percent on the value of liquor sold in licensed establishments as defined
in Title 28‑A, section 2, subsection 15, in accordance with Title 28‑A, chapter 43
and liquor sold for on-premises consumption by a licensed brewery, small brewery,
winery, small winery, distillery or small distillery pursuant to Title 28‑A, section
1355‑A, subsection 2, paragraph B;
(3) Nine percent on the value of rental of living quarters in any hotel, rooming
house or tourist or trailer camp;
(4) Ten percent on the value of rental for a period of less than one year of:
(a) An automobile; or
(c) A loaner vehicle that is provided other than to a motor vehicle dealer's
service customers pursuant to a manufacturer's or dealer's warranty; and
(5) Ten percent on the value of adult use cannabis, adult use cannabis products
and, if sold by a person to an individual who is not a qualifying patient, cannabis
and cannabis products beginning on the first day of the calendar month in which
adult use cannabis and adult use cannabis products may be sold in the State by a
cannabis establishment licensed to conduct retail sales pursuant to Title 28‑B,
chapter 1.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §1811, sub-§1, ¶E is enacted to read:
E. For sales occurring on or after January 1, 2026, the rate of tax is 5.5% on the value
of all tangible personal property and taxable services, except the rate of tax is:
(1) Eight percent on the value of prepared food;
(2) Eight percent on the value of liquor sold in licensed establishments, as defined
in Title 28‑A, section 2, subsection 15, in accordance with Title 28‑A, chapter 43,
and liquor sold for on-premises consumption by a licensed brewery, small brewery,
winery, small winery, distillery or small distillery pursuant to Title 28‑A, section
1355‑A, subsection 2, paragraph B;
(3) Nine percent on the value of rental of living quarters in any hotel, rooming
house or tourist or trailer camp;
(4) Ten percent on the value of rental for a period of less than one year of:
(a) An automobile; or
(b) A loaner vehicle that is provided other than to a motor vehicle dealer's
service customers pursuant to a manufacturer's or dealer's warranty;
Page 1 - 132LR2082(01)

(5) Ten percent on the value of adult use cannabis, adult use cannabis products
and, if sold by a person to an individual who is not a qualifying patient, cannabis
and cannabis products sold by a cannabis establishment licensed to conduct retail
sales pursuant to Title 28‑B, chapter 1; and
(6) Twenty percent on the value of hemp, as defined in Title 7, section 2231,
subsection 1-A, paragraph D, and hemp products that contain
tetrahydrocannabinol.
Sec. 3. 36 MRSA §1818, as amended by PL 2021, c. 645, §5 and c. 669, §5, is
further amended to read:
§1818. Tax on adult use cannabis and adult use cannabis products
All sales tax revenue collected pursuant to section 1811 on the sale of adult use
cannabis and adult use cannabis products must be deposited into the General Fund, except
that, before January 1, 2026, on or before the last day of each month, the State Controller
shall transfer 12% of the sales tax revenue received by the assessor during the preceding
month pursuant to section 1811 to the Adult Use Cannabis Public Health and Safety and
Municipal Opt-in Fund established under Title 28‑B, section 1101. Beginning January 1,
2026, all sales tax revenue collected pursuant to section 1811 on the sale of adult use
cannabis and adult use cannabis products must be deposited into the General Fund, except
that, on or before the last day of each month, the State Controller shall transfer 6% of the
sales tax revenue received by the assessor during the preceding month pursuant to section
1811 to the Adult Use Cannabis Public Health and Safety and Municipal Opt-in Fund
established under Title 28-B, section 1101.
Sec. 4. 36 MRSA §4921, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Average wholesale price. "Average wholesale price" means the median
wholesale price per pound or fraction thereof of cannabis flower or cannabis trim that is
sold or transferred from cultivation facility licensees to other licensees in the State, as
determined by the department on an annual basis by routine technical rulemaking as
described by Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 5. 36 MRSA §4921, sub-§9-A is enacted to read:
9-A. Products manufacturing facility. "Products manufacturing facility" has the
same meaning as in Title 28-B, section 102-A, subsection 51.
Sec. 6. 36 MRSA §4923, as amended by PL 2023, c. 679, Pt. C, §13, is repealed.
Sec. 7. 36 MRSA §4923-A, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 323, §5 and amended by c.
669, §5, is repealed.
Sec. 8. 36 MRSA §4923-B is enacted to read:
§4923-B. Excise tax imposed; beginning January 1, 2026
1. Excise tax on average wholesale price. Beginning January 1, 2026, a cultivation
facility licensee shall pay an excise tax at the rate of 10% of the average wholesale price of
adult use cannabis, including cannabis flower, cannabis trim, immature cannabis plants and
seedlings, mature cannabis plants and cannabis seeds, sold to other licensees in this State.
Page 2 - 132LR2082(01)

2. Sales and transfers between cultivation facilities and products manufacturing
facilities. An excise tax is not imposed under this section on a sale by a cultivation facility
or products manufacturing facility of adult use cannabis to another cultivation facility or
products manufacturing facility or on a transfer by a cultivation facility or products
manufacturing facility of adult use cannabis to another cultivation facility or products
manufacturing facility.
Sec. 9. 36 MRSA §4924, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 231, Pt. B, §7, is amended to
read:
§4924. Returns; payment of excise tax
On Beginning January 1, 2026, on or before the 15th day of each month following the
end of each quarter, a cultivation facility licensee shall file a return, as required by the
assessor, and pay to the assessor all excise taxes due under this chapter for the preceding
calendar month quarter.
Sec. 10. 36 MRSA §4925, as amended by PL 2021, c. 645, §6 and c. 669, §5, is
further amended to read:
§4925. Application of excise tax revenue
All excise tax revenue collected by the assessor pursuant to this chapter on the sale of
adult use cannabis must be deposited into the General Fund, except that, before January 1,
2026, on or before the last day of each month, the assessor shall transfer 12% of the excise
tax revenue received during the preceding month pursuant to this chapter to the Adult Use
Cannabis Public Health and Safety and Municipal Opt-in Fund established in Title 28‑B,
section 1101. Beginning January 1, 2026, all excise tax revenue collected by the assessor
pursuant to this chapter on the sale of adult use cannabis must be deposited into the General
Fund, except that, on or before the last day of every 3rd month, the assessor shall transfer
6% of the excise tax revenue received during the preceding quarter pursuant to this chapter
to the Adult Use Cannabis Public Health and Safety and Municipal Opt-in Fund established
in Title 28-B, section 1101.
Sec. 11. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026.